Utah statutes.
70D-2-505.   Relief from order.

A person aggrieved by a rule, order, temporary order, decision, ruling, or other act or failure to act by the commissioner under this chapter is entitled to judicial review as provided under Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

